incubator/apertium-en-sco.sco.dix
    <pardef n="probj_dem__prn">
      <e>
        <i></i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>me</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ye</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>you</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>him</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>her</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>it</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>hit</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>us</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'s</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>thaim</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>this</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>these</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>that</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>those</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cau/f__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ee__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/it__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>it<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eet</l>
          <r>it<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/oose__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oose</l>
          <r>oose<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ice</l>
          <r>oose<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sh/ae__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>ae<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uin</l>
          <r>ae<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="w/umman__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>umman</l>
          <r>umman<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eemen</l>
          <r>umman<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/uith__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uith</l>
          <r>uith<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeth</l>
          <r>uith<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/uiss__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiss</l>
          <r>uiss<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eese</l>
          <r>uiss<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/an__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hoose__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="habb/y__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/cou__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cou</l>
          <r>cou<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kye</l>
          <r>cou<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BBC__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="niver__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mebbe__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="whaur__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="an__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="efter__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tae__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bricht__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="braw__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/guid__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>guid</l>
          <r>guid<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>better</l>
          <r>guid<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>best</l>
          <r>guid<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/bad__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bad</l>
          <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>warse</l>
          <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>waur</l>
          <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>warst</l>
          <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="cauf"><i>cau</i><par n="cau/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ee"><i>ee</i><par n="ee__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fit"><i>f</i><par n="f/it__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moose"><i>m</i><par n="m/oose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="loose"><i>l</i><par n="m/oose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="shae"><i>sh</i><par n="sh/ae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wumman"><i>w</i><par n="w/umman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuith"><i>t</i><par n="t/uith__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guiss"><i>g</i><par n="g/uiss__n"/></e>
    <e lm="man"><i>m</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cou"><i></i><par n="/cou__n"/></e>
    <e lm="habby"><i>habb</i><par n="habb/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="category"><i>categor</i><par n="habb/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="economy"><i>econom</i><par n="habb/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veesitor"><i>veesitor</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cultur"><i>cultur</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hame"><i>hame</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Wikipædia"><i>Wikipædia</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ootcome"><i>ootcome</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sport"><i>sport</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eddication"><i>eddication</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="implementation"><i>implementation</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceity"><i>ceit</i><par n="habb/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceety"><i>ceet</i><par n="habb/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flei"><i>flei</i><par n="habb/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="haun"><i>haun</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
    <e lm="whaur"><i>whaur</i><par n="whaur__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="niver"><i>niver</i><par n="niver__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="the nicht"><i>the<b/>nicht</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="the day"><i>the<b/>day</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="the nou"><i>the<b/>nou</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="the morn"><i>the<b/>morn</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mair"><i>mair</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="maist"><i>maist</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ootthrou"><i>ootthrou</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="onwarts"><i>onwarts</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="syne"><i>syne</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="an"><i>an</i><par n="an__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="or"><i>or</i><par n="an__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="efter"><i>efter</i><par n="efter__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="as weel as"><i>as<b/>weel<b/>as</i><par n="efter__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="frae"><i>frae</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="oot"><i>oot</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wi"><i>wi</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="for tae"><i>for<b/>tae</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mair nor"><i>mair<b/>nor</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="for"><i>for</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="guid"><i></i><par n="/guid__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bad"><i></i><par n="/bad__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="braw"><i>braw</i><par n="braw__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="straucht"><i>straucht</i><par n="braw__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="puir"><i>puir</i><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="greet"><i>greet</i><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="scienteefic"><i>scienteefic</i><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="naitural"><i>naitural</i><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pheesical"><i>pheesical</i><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="clessical"><i>clessical</i><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="naitional"><i>naitional</i><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Scots"><p><l>Scots</l><r>scots</r></p><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gie a haun"><i>gie</i><par n="gie__vblex_sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>haun</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>haun</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="CDC"><i>CDC</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="DVD" a="carmentano"><i>DVD</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="FBI" a="doriua"><i>FBI</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="NASA" a="doriua"><i>NASA</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PNB"><i>PNB</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="TV"><i>TV</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="VAT"><i>VAT</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="S.A."><i>S.A.</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mp3" a="prompsit2cdl"><i>mp3</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
